Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.050

License—Issuance, renewal—Fee—Display.

(1)(a) Upon receipt of an application for a license, the department may issue a license if the applicant and the nursing home's facilities meet the requirements established under this chapter, except that the department shall issue a temporary license to a court-appointed receiver for a period not to exceed six months from the date of appointment.

(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, prior to the issuance or renewal of the license, the licensee shall pay a license fee. Beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter, the per bed license fee must be established in the omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or additions made to that act. The license fees established in the omnibus appropriations act and any amendment or additions made to that act may not exceed the department's annual licensing and oversight activity costs and shall include the department's cost of paying providers for the amount of the license fee attributed to medicaid clients.

(ii) No fee shall be required of government operated institutions or court-appointed receivers.

(c) A license issued under this chapter may not exceed twelve months in duration and expires on a date set by the department.

(d) In the event of a change of ownership, the previously established license expiration date shall not change.

(2) All applications and fees for renewal of the license shall be submitted to the department not later than thirty days prior to the date of expiration of the license. All applications and fees, if any, for change of ownership shall be submitted to the department not later than sixty days before the date of the proposed change of ownership. A nursing home license shall be issued only to the person who applied for the license. The license is valid only for the operation of the facility at the location specified in the license application. Licenses are not transferable or assignable. Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 401; 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 1; 1989 c 372 s 1; 1985 c 284 s 4; 1981 2nd ex.s. c 11 s 2; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 17; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 247 s 2; 1953 c 160 s 4; 1951 c 117 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 3 ss 401-403: "Sections 401 through 403 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2011." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 603.]

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 70.128.005.

Effective date—1991 sp.s. c 8: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1991." [ 1991 sp.s. c 8 s 21.]

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.